src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON isi-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          isi-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    isi-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   isi-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    isi-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           isis-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     isis-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    isis-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     isis-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           isii-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     isii-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    isii-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     isii-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON isi-AFF-NoPrefix
! Two 3S, 3P, 4 forms are attested here (e.g., ìzìl, ììzil "3S got hot")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;

LEXICON isi-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Note 3SG/3PL/4SG ì- in this paradigm, compared to si-(I)PFV 3SG/4PL/4SG ìs-.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
! When an inner prefix is present, 1SG forms also appear as Cas (e.g.,
! dìsisho ~ dasho "I went, walked")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;

LEXICON isi-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;


LEXICON isis-AFF-NoPrefix
! CHECK: 3S form requires confirmation in additional documentation
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isís  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON isis-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Same forms as sis-AFF-InnerPrefix; reuse those definitions here.
                                             sis-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON isis-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsís  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;


LEXICON isii-AFF-NoPrefix
! Two 3P, 4 forms are attested (e.g., gììdùn, gìsdùn '3P got a swelling')
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON isii-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Note 3SG/3PL/4SG ìì- in this paradigm, compared to si-(I)PFV 3SG/4PL/4SG ìs-.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì   #;

LEXICON isii-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì   #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ìsaà  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology O? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ìsiì   #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ìsiì #; ! CHECK: morphophonology ? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsas2 #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì   #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì   #; 
